District of Columbia statutes.
7-1204.04

Redisclosure.

Redisclosure of any mental health information disclosed pursuant to this subchapter shall be governed by order of the court or, if no order is issued, by the rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 404, 25 DCR 5055
1973 Ed., § 6-1631.
1981 Ed., § 6-2034.